Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TRANSFER; SECRETARY OF STATE.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the secretary of state for the administration of elections in 2026 and for the provision of services previously funded by federal funds. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) The secretary of state, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, must transfer $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 from the general fund to the voting operations, technology, and election resources account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 5.305. This is a onetime transfer. new text end